Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-223
Insurance companies; incorporators and directors; liability.

The original incorporators, until the election of directors, and thereafter the directors shall be jointly and severally liable for any losses incurred during the following time or times: (1) For the excess of any policy above the maximum single risks prescribed by section 44-222 during the time that such policy exceeds such maximum single risks; (2) for any losses occurring upon any new risk taken after the expiration of the period designated by the Department of Insurance in accordance with sections 44-120 to 44-124 in which to make good any deficiency; and (3) for all debts and liabilities contracted prior to the time the company received its certificate of authority.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 89, p. 432;

R.S.1913, § 3226;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. V, § 12, p. 612;

C.S.1922, § 7825;

C.S.1929, § 44-412;

R.S.1943, § 44-223;

Laws 1959, c. 198, § 1, p. 706;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 71.